Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1504.02
Department; establish telephone line.

The department shall establish a telephone line to provide information on the department's programs and requirements and to report complaints and suspected violations of the various environmental statutes and regulations which the department administers, as well as complaints regarding the department's regulation and enforcement activities. The department may charge a fee for the use of such a telephone line.

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 29.